Utah statutes.
49-23-601.   Long-term disability coverage.

(1)  A participating employer shall cover a public safety employee who initially enters employment on or after July 1, 2011, under Chapter 21, Public Employees' Long-Term Disability Act, or a substantially similar long-term disability program.

(2) (a)  A participating employer shall cover a firefighter employee who initially enters employment on or after July 1, 2011, under Chapter 21, Public Employees' Long-Term Disability Act.

(b)  In accordance with this section, a participating employer shall provide long-term disability benefit coverage for a volunteer firefighter as provided under Section 49-16-701.

(c)  The office shall ensure that the cost of the long-term disability benefit coverage provided under Subsections (2)(a) and (b) is funded with revenue received under Section 49-11-901.5.

